Louisiana, session 2026, HB554.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:2199(B)(2)(a) through (d) are hereby amended and reenacted and
R.S. 40:2199(B)(4) and (5) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2199. Violations; penalties; fines; notice; hearings; appeal; licensed entities
B.
* * *
(2) A schedule of civil fines by class of violations shall be as follows:
(a) Class A - Violations that create a condition or occurrence relating to the
operation and maintenance of a facility, which result in death or serious harm to a
resident or client. Civil fines shall not exceed two thousand five hundred five
thousand dollars for the first violation and shall not exceed ten five thousand dollars
per day for repeat violations.
(b) Class B -Violations that create a condition or occurrence relating to the
operation and maintenance of a facility which create a substantial probability that
death or serious physical or mental harm to a resident or client will result from the
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-977 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 554
violation. Civil fines shall not exceed one two thousand five hundred dollars for the
first violation and shall not exceed three six thousand dollars per day for repeat
violations.
(c) Class C - Violations that create a condition or occurrence relating to the
operation and maintenance of a facility which create a potential for harm by directly
threatening the health, safety, rights, or welfare of a resident or client. Civil fines
shall not exceed one two thousand dollars for the first violation and shall not exceed
two four thousand dollars per day for repeat violations.
(d) Class D - Violations related to administrative and reporting requirements
that do not directly threaten the health, safety, rights, or welfare of a resident or
client. Civil fines shall not exceed one two hundred dollars for the first violation and
shall not exceed two hundred fifty five hundred dollars per day for repeat violations.
* * *
(4) If a facility fails to report abuse, neglect, serious injury, or death in a
timely manner, a penalty may be assessed as a separate violation for each day
delayed.
(5) On November first of each year, the Louisiana Department of Health
shall publish a report of penalties assessed, penalties collected, repeat violations, and
facilities with three or more deficiencies within a twelve-month period. The
department shall submit the report to the David R. Poynter Legislative Library.